Hawaii, session 2025, SB385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 514B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to subpart C of part VI to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§514B-    Governing documents; online access.  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in the association's declaration, bylaws, or house rules, all governing documents of the association as defined by section 514B-191(c), shall be made available to all owners, occupants, or tenants on the association's website free of charge." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________